Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-903
Precincts; creation; requirements; election commissioner or county clerk; powers and duties.

(1) The election commissioner or county clerk shall create precincts composed of compact and contiguous territory within the boundary lines of legislative districts. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, precincts shall contain:

(a) At least seventy-five registered voters based on the number of voters voting at the last statewide general election; and

(b) No more than one thousand seven hundred fifty registered voters based on the number of voters voting at that precinct's polling place on election day during the immediately preceding presidential election.

(2) A precinct may contain less than seventy-five registered voters if, in the judgment of the election commissioner or county clerk, it is necessary to avoid creating an undue hardship on the registered voters in the precinct.

(3) The election commissioner or county clerk shall revise and rearrange the precincts and increase or decrease them at such times as may be necessary to make the precincts comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section as nearly as practicable. The election commissioner or county clerk shall, when necessary and possible, readjust precinct boundaries to coincide with the boundaries of cities, villages, and school districts which are divided into districts or wards for election purposes. The election commissioner or county clerk shall not make any precinct changes in precinct boundaries or divide precincts into two or more parts between the statewide primary and general elections unless he or she has been authorized to do so by the Secretary of State. If changes are authorized, the election commissioner or county clerk shall notify each state and local candidate affected by the change.

(4) The election commissioner or county clerk may alter and divide the existing precincts, except that when any city of the first class by ordinance divides any ward of such city into two or more voting districts or polling places, the election commissioner or county clerk shall establish precincts or polling places in conformity with such ordinance. No such alteration or division shall take place between the statewide primary and general elections except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 246;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 80;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 18;

Laws 2005, LB 401, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB449, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 44;

Laws 2021, LB285, § 15;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 40;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 16.
April 16, 2026